Utah statutes.
53B-16-203.   Qualifications for entrance to community colleges --
Preference to veterans.
(1)  The colleges shall give enrollment preference to veterans who furnish
proof of other than a dishonorable discharge from the armed forces of the
United States.
(2)  Admission at the colleges is based upon an individual's interest,
ability, and potential for the desired occupational area and payment of the
required tuition or fee.  The colleges may not deny admission on the basis of
an individual's previous schooling or training.
